Louisiana, session 2026, HB698.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 24:35.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§35.2. Membership of the House of Representatives
The House of Representatives of the Legislature of Louisiana shall be
composed of one hundred five members. The state shall be divided into the
representative districts provided in this Section. One representative shall be elected
from each district.
(1) District 1 is composed of Precincts 2-6 and 2-8 of Bossier Parish and
Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 1-4, 1-5, 1-6, 1-7, 1-8, 1-9, 1-12, 1-13, 2-1, 2-2, 2-3, 2-5, 2-6,
2-8, 2-9, 2-10, 2-11, 2-12, 3-1, 3-2, 3-3, 3-4, and 3-5 of Caddo Parish.
(2) District 2 is composed of Precincts 2-5A, 2-12A, 2-12B, 2-13, 2-23, and
4-8D of Bossier Parish and Precincts 3-6, 3-7, 3-8, 3-9, 4-1, 4-2, 5-1, 5-2, 5-3, 5-4,
5-5, 5-6, 5-7, 5-8, 5-9, 5-11, 7-5, and 7-6 of Caddo Parish.
(3) District 3 is composed of Precincts 6-2, 6-3, 6-4, 6-5, 6-7, 7-8, 7-9, 9-4,
9-5, 9-6, 9-9, 9-10, 9-11, 10-1, 10-3, 10-4, 10-5, 10-6, 10-7, 10-8, 10-9, 11-4, and
11-5 of Caddo Parish.
Page 1 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1034 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 698
(4) District 4 is composed of Precincts 1-10, 1-11, 1-14, 2-4, 2-7, 6-6, 6-8,
6-9, 6-10, 7-1, 7-2, 7-3, 7-4, 7-7, 7-10, 11-3, 12-1, 12-2, 12-3, 12-4, 12-5, 12-6, 12-9,
12-10, and 12-11 of Caddo Parish.
(5) District 5 is composed of Precincts 2-7, 3-8, 3-9, 3-12, 3-14, 3-15, 3-18,
3-19, 3-20, 4-3, 4-6, 4-7, 4-8, 5-8, 5-9, 5-10, 5-11, 5-12, 5-13, 5-15, 6-7, 6-8, 6-9,
7-12, 7-15, 7-16, 7-21, 7-27B, 16-8, 16-9, 17-8, 17-9, 17-10, 17-11, 17-12, 17-13,
17-13A, 17-14, 17-15, and 17-16 of Orleans Parish.
(6) District 6 is composed of Precincts 4-3, 4-4, 4-5, 4-6, 4-7, 4-8, 4-9, 4-10,
5-10, 6-1, 8-1, 8-2, 8-3, 8-4, 8-5, 8-6, 8-7, 8-8, 8-9, 9-2, 9-3, 9-7, 9-8, and 10-2 of
Caddo Parish.
(7) District 7 is composed of Precincts 11-1, 11-2, 11-6, 11-7, 11-8, 11-9,
11-10, 12-7, and 12-8 of Caddo Parish; Precincts 10, 11, 16, 22, 23, 28, 30, 30A, 33,
34, 35, 46, 46B, and 51 of De Soto Parish and Precincts 3-5, 6-2, 6-3, 7-2, 7-3, 7-4,
7-5, 8-1, 8-2, 9-2, 9-3, 9-4, and 9-5 of Sabine Parish.
(8) District 8 is composed of Precincts 2-1, 2-1A, 2-2, 2-4, 2-7, 2-9, 2-10,
2-11, 2-17A, 2-18B, 2-18C, 2-18F, 2-18G, 2-18H, 2-18I, 2-19, 2-21A, 2-21B, 2-21C,
2-21D, 2-21E, 2-22A, 2-22B, and 2-22C of Bossier Parish.
(9) District 9 is composed of Precincts 1-4, 2-3, 2-3A, 2-14, 2-15, 2-16,
2-17B, 2-20, 4-2, 4-2A, 4-3A, 4-3B, 4-3D, 4-4A, 4-4B, 4-5A, 4-6A, 4-6B, 4-8A,
4-11A, 4-11B, and 4-11C of Bossier Parish.
(10) District 10 is composed of Precincts 2-18D, 3-1, 3-2, 3-3, 3-4, and 4-1A
of Bossier Parish and Webster Parish.
(11) District 11 is composed of Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-4, 1-5, 1-7, 2-1, 2-2,
2-3, 3-1, 3-2, 3-3, 3-5, 3-6, 3-7, and 7-1 of Bienville Parish; Claiborne Parish; and
Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 2-1, 3-1, 3-3, 3-4, 9-1, 9-2, 9-3, 10-1, 10-2, 10-4, 10-5, 10-6,
11-1, 11-3, 11-4, 11-5, 12-1, 12-2, 12-3, 12-4, and 12-6 of Lincoln Parish.
(12) District 12 is composed of Precincts 3-2, 3-5, 3-6, 4-1, 4-2, 4-3, 4-4,
4-5, 4-6, 5-1, 5-2, 5-3, 5-4, 6-1, 6-2, 6-3, 6-4, 6-5, 6-6, 7-1, 7-2, 8-1, 8-2, 8-3, 9-4,
and 10-3 of Lincoln Parish and Union Parish.
Page 2 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1034 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 698
(13) District 13 is composed of Caldwell Parish; Catahoula Parish; Jackson
Parish; and Precincts 1-1, 1-3, 1-5, 2-1, 2-3, 3-1A, 3-1B, 3-2, 3-3, 4-1, 5-1, 5-5, 6-1,
6-1A, 6-3, 6-6, 7-1, 7-1A, 7-2, 7-2A, and 7-7 of Winn Parish.
(14) District 14 is composed of Precincts 2-1, 2-2A, 2-2C, 2-5, 2-7, 2-8, 3-3,
6-1, 6-2, 6-2A, 7-1, 7-2, 7-3, 8-1, 8-2, 8-3, 8-3A, 9-1, 11-1, and 11-2 of Avoyelles
Parish; Concordia Parish; and Precincts 1, 2, 4, 6, 7, 7A, 8, 8A, 9, 9A, and 10 of
Pointe Coupee Parish.
(15) District 15 is composed of Precincts 32, 33, 35, 37, 38, 39, 41, 44, 44A,
45, 46, 49, 51, 51A, 52, 52A, 53, 54, 55, and 56A of Ouachita Parish.
(16) District 16 is composed of Precincts 3, 5, 8, 9, 9A, 10, 13, 14, 59, 60,
62, 63, 65, 65A, 66, 67, 68, 69, 70, 72, 73, 74, 76, and 79 of Ouachita Parish.
(17) District 17 is composed of Precincts 11, 12, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21,
22, 23, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 30, 31, 34, 40, 47, 48, 56, 57, and 58 of Ouachita Parish.
(18) District 18 is composed of Precincts 4, 5, 20, 21, 22, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28,
29, 31, and 32 of Iberville Parish and Precincts 6, 7, 8, 16, 17, 20, 21, 24, 25, 26, 27,
28, 29, 30, 31, 32, 33, 34, 35, 36, 37, 38, 39, 40, 41, 42, and 43 of St. Martin Parish.
(19) District 19 is composed of Precincts 6, 23, 26-1, 27, 40, 42, 45, 47, and
48 of Morehouse Parish; Precincts 1, 1A, 2, 4, 6, 7, 36, 42, 43, 50, 61, 64, 71, 75, 77,
and 78 of Ouachita Parish; and Precincts 8, 9, 14, 14A, 15, 16, and 18 of West
Carroll Parish.
(20) District 20 is composed of Franklin Parish; Richland Parish; and Tensas
Parish.
(21) District 21 is composed of East Carroll Parish; Madison Parish;
Precincts 1, 3-1, 7, 8, 12, 13, 14, 16, 20, 21, 24, 29, 31, 32, 35, 37, 39-1, 39-2, 51, 53,
and 54 of Morehouse Parish; and Precincts 1, 2, 3, 3A, 3B, 3C, 3D, 4, 5, 5A, 5B, 6,
7, 10, 11, and 12 of West Carroll Parish.
(22) District 22 is composed of Precincts 1-3, 1-6, 3-4, 4-1, 4-2, 4-3, 5-1,
5-2, 5-3, 5-4, 6-1, 6-2, 6-3, 6-4, 6-5, 7-2, 7-3, and 7-4 of Bienville Parish; Precincts
1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 1-3A, 1-3B, 1-5, 4-7A, 4-7B, 4-8B, 4-8C, 4-8E, 4-8G, 4-9, and 4-10
Page 3 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1034 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 698
of Bossier Parish; Precincts 9-1, 9-12, and 9-13 of Caddo Parish; Precincts 1-1A,
1-12, 2-1, 2-2, 2-3, 2-4, 2-5, 2-6, 2-7A, and 2-9 of Natchitoches Parish; and Precincts
4-2, 4-3, 4-5, 5-2, and 5-3 of Winn Parish.
(23) District 23 is composed of Precincts 1, 4, 5, 9, 26, 31, 32, 38, 42, 53, 56,
and 59 of De Soto Parish; Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 1-3A, 1-4, 1-4A, 1-5, 1-5A, 1-6,
1-7, 1-8, 1-9, 1-10, 1-10A, 1-10B, 1-11, 1-13, 1-14, 2-7, 2-8, 3-2, 3-4, and 3-7 of
Natchitoches Parish; and Red River Parish.
(24) District 24 is composed of Precincts C30, C37-A, C37-B, S1, S2, S5,
S6A, S6B, S8, S9, and S11 of Rapides Parish; Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-4, 2-1, 2-2, 2-6,
3-2, 3-6, 4-1, 5-1, 5-2, 5-3, 5-4, and 5-8 of Sabine Parish; and Precincts 1-5, 1-5A,
1-7, 1-9, 2-1, 2-1A, 2-2, 2-2A, 2-3, 2-4, 3-1, 3-2, 3-3, 3-4, 3-5, 4-3B, 4-3N, 5-1, 5-2,
5-2A, 6-1, 6-2, 6-3, 6-4, 7-3, 7-4A, 8-1, 8-2, and 8-3 of Vernon Parish.
(25) District 25 is composed of Grant Parish; Precincts 1-9A, 3-1, 3-3, 3-5,
3-6, 3-8, 3-9, 3-10, 4-1, 4-2, 4-3, 4-4, 4-5, 4-6, 4-7, 4-8, and 4-9 of Natchitoches
Parish; and Precincts N6, N15, N16, N18-A, N18-B, N19, N20, N21, and S4 of
Rapides Parish.
(26) District 26 is composed of Precincts C1, C2, C3, C4, C5, C6, C7, C8,
C9, C10, C11-A, C11-B, C13, C14, C15, C17, C18, C19, C20, C21, C24, C25, C26,
C27, C28, C32, C38-A, C38-B, C39, C40, N1, N2, N3, N4, N5, and N8 of Rapides
Parish.
(27) District 27 is composed of La Salle Parish and Precincts N7, N9, N10,
N11, N12, N13-A, N13-B, N14-A, N14-B, N17, N22, N23, N24, N25, N26, N27,
N28, N29, and S16 of Rapides Parish.
(28) District 28 is composed of Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 2-2, 2-4, 2-4A, 3-1,
3-1A, 4-1, 4-2, 4-2A, 5-1A, 9-2, 9-2A, 9-3, 9-5, 10-2, 10-2A, 10-3A, 10-3B, and
10-4 of Avoyelles Parish and Precincts C22, C23, C31, C33, C34, C35, C36, C41,
C42, S13, S14, S15, S17, S18, S19, and S20 of Rapides Parish.
(29) District 29 is composed of Precincts 1-85, 1-86, 1-92, 1-94, 1-95, 1-100,
2-5, 2-32, and 2-37 of East Baton Rouge Parish and West Baton Rouge Parish.
Page 4 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1034 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 698
(30) District 30 is composed of Precincts 7, 15, 16, 16A, 17, 17A, 18, 18A,
25, 25B, 26, 27, 27A, 27B, 28, 28A, and 30 of Beauregard Parish and Precincts 1-1,
1-1A, 1-1B, 1-2, 1-3, 1-3C, 1-4, 1-4B, 1-4C, 1-6, 1-6A, 1-6B, 1-7B, 1-8, 1-8A, 4-1,
4-2, 4-3, 4-3A, 4-3C, 4-3G, 4-3K, 4-3L, 7-1, 7-2, 7-2A, 7-2B, 7-4, 7-5, 7-5A, and
7-5D of Vernon Parish.
(31) District 31 is composed of Precincts 34, 35, 36, 67, 85, 86, 105, 106,
109, 117, 125, and 133 of Lafayette Parish and Precincts 22, 24, 25, 26, 26A, 26B,
32, 34, 34A, 35, 36A, 37, 39, 46, 46C, 46D, and 46E of Vermilion Parish.
(32) District 32 is composed of Allen Parish; Precincts 1, 1A, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6,
9, 10, 11, 11B, 12, 12A, 13, 14, 14A, 19, 20, 21, and 22 of Beauregard Parish and
Precincts 12, 13, 16, 16A, 17, and 18 of Jefferson Davis Parish.
(33) District 33 is composed of Precincts 400, 401, 402, 403, 404, 405, 406,
407, 408, 460E, 460W, 461, 465, 466E, 466W, 467, 468, 469, 700, 701, 702, 703,
760, 761, and 762 of Calcasieu Parish.
(34) District 34 is composed of Precincts 311, 312, 313W, 316E, 316W, 317,
318, 319N, 319S, 320E, 320W, 321, 322, 323, 327, 328, 329, 330, 332N, 332S, 334,
335, 336, 338, and 371N of Calcasieu Parish.
(35) District 35 is composed of Precincts 160E, 160W, 161, 162E, 162W,
163, 164, 165, 166E, 166W, 167, 440, 463, 464, 560, 561, 562, 600, 601, 602, 603,
660, 661, 662, 663, and 664 of Calcasieu Parish.
(36) District 36 is composed of Precincts 260, 261, 262, 325, 326, 331, 333,
337, 339, 340, 362, 363, 365, 366, 367, 368, 369, 370, 371S, and 372 of Calcasieu
Parish.
(37) District 37 is composed of Precincts 2-5, 4-3, 4-4, 4-5, 5-1, 5-2, 5-3,
5-4, 5-5, 6-1, 6-3, 6-4, 6-5, 6-6, 6-7, 6-10, 6-13, and 6-15 of Acadia Parish and
Precincts 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 5A, 6, 7, 8, 8A, 9A, 9B, 10, 10A, 14, 19, 20, 21, 23, and 23B
of Jefferson Davis Parish.
Page 5 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1034 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 698
(38) District 38 is composed of Precincts 300, 301, 302, 303, 304, 305, 306,
307, 308, 309E, 309W, 310, 313E, 314, 315E, 315W, 324, 360, 361, 364, 441, 800,
801, 860N, 860S, 861E, and 861W of Calcasieu Parish.
(39) District 39 is composed of Precincts 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 26, 29, 30,
31, 50, 71, 113, 114, 119, 122, 123, and 124 of Lafayette Parish.
(40) District 40 is composed of Precincts 6, 8, 9, 9A, 10, 10A, 11, 11B, 12,
14, 14A, 14B, 18, 18A, 18B, 19, 19A, 20, 20B, 21, 21A, 22, 22B, 23, 23A, 24, 24B,
25, 26, 26A, 27, 28, 29, 29A, 32, 32A, 34, 34A, 35, 36, 37, 37A, and 38 of St.
Landry Parish.
(41) District 41 is composed of Precincts 1010, 1040, 1041, 1050, 1080,
1081, 1090, 1100, 1101, 1110, 1120, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1170, 2010, 2010A, 2020,
2030, 2040, 3020, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3040, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3060, 3070, 3071,
4011, 4020, 4021, and 4030 of Evangeline Parish; Precincts S7, S10, S21, S22, S23,
S24, S25, S26, S27, S28, and S29 of Rapides Parish; and Precincts 44, 44A, 44B, 45,
46, 47, 48, 49, 50, 50A, 51, 51A, and 52 of St. Landry Parish.
(42) District 42 is composed of Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 1-4, 1-5, 1-6, 1-7,
1-8, 2-1, 2-2, 2-3, 2-4, 3-1, 3-2, 3-3, 3-4, 3-5, 3-7, 4-1, 4-2, 4-6, 6-2, 6-8, 6-12, 6-14,
6-16, 7-2, 7-3, and 7-4 of Acadia Parish and Precincts 33, 33A, 41, 41A, 42, and 43
of St. Landry Parish.
(43) District 43 is composed of Precincts 87, 88, 89, 91, 92, 93, 94, 95, 96,
97, 98, 99, 104, 115, 120, 121, 126, 127, 128, and 130 of Lafayette Parish.
(44) District 44 is composed of Precincts 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18,
19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 25, 51, 52, 53, 54, 55, 56, 57, 58, 59, 60, 63, 64, 65, 66, 68, 72,
and 112 of Lafayette Parish.
(45) District 45 is composed of Precincts 32, 33, 38, 39, 40, 41, 42, 43, 44,
45, 46, 47, 48, 49, 69, 70, 73, 74, 75, 76, 77, 78, 79, 80, 81, 82, 83, 84, and 90 of
Lafayette Parish.
(46) District 46 is composed of Precincts 1020, 1030, 1031, 1091, 1130,
1140, 1150, 1171, 3010, 4001, 4010, 4012, 4040, 5004, 5010, 5020, 5030, 5040,
Page 6 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1034 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 698
5041, and 5050 of Evangeline Parish; Precincts 11, 12, 13, 13B, 14, 15, 16, 16B, 17,
17A, 18, 19, and 20 of Pointe Coupee Parish; and Precincts 1, 1A, 1B, 1C, 1D, 2, 2A,
2B, 2C, 3, 4, 4A, 4B, 5, 7, 7A, 13, 13A, 15, 16, 16A, 17, 30, 30A, 30B, 31, 39, 39A,
and 40 of St. Landry Parish.
(47) District 47 is composed of Cameron Parish; Precincts 27, 28, and 37 of
Lafayette Parish; and Precincts 1, 2, 4, 5, 6, 7, 7A, 7B, 7C, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 14, 16,
17, 18, 19, 19A, 20, 20A, 20B, 21, 21A, 23, 28, 29, 30, 31, 38, 40, 41, 42, 56, 57A,
and 57B of Vermilion Parish.
(48) District 48 is composed of Precincts 1-3, 3-2, 6-2, 7-1, 7-2, 7-4, 7-5,
8-1, 8-2, 8-3, 9-4, 9-5, 11-3, and 11-5 of Iberia Parish; Precincts 100, 101, 102, 110,
116, 134, and 135 of Lafayette Parish; Precincts 3, 4, 5, 9 (Part) Tract 020401 -
Blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 5000, 5003, 6000, 6001, 6002, 6003, 6004, 6005, 6006,
6007, 6008, 7002, 9012, and 9013; Tract 020504 - Blocks 2006, 2007, and 2008;
Tract 020601 - Blocks 5001, 5017, 5018, and 18, 19, 22, and 23 of St. Martin Parish.
(49) District 49 is composed of Precincts 2-2, 2-3, 3-3, 3-4, 3-5, 5-1, 5-2,
5-5, 6-5, 10-3, 10-4, 12-4, 13-1, 13-2, 13-3, 13-4, 13-5, 14-1, 14-3, 14-4, and 14-5
of Iberia Parish; Precincts 103, 107, 108, 111, 118, and 136 of Lafayette Parish; and
Precincts 44, 45, 45A, 46B, 47, 49, 49A, 49B, 49C, 50, 51, and 53 of Vermilion
Parish.
(50) District 50 is composed of Precincts 7-2, 7-3, 8-1, and 9-1 of
Assumption Parish; Precincts 1 and 2 of St. Martin Parish; and Precincts 4, 6, 6A,
10, 14, 17, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 30, 31, 32, 33, 34, 35, 36, 37, 38,
39, 40, 41, and 42 of St. Mary Parish.
(51) District 51 is composed of Precincts 2-3, 2-4, 2-5, 3-1, 3-2, 4-3, and 4-4
of Assumption Parish; Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-4, 1-6, 11-3, and 11-5 of Lafourche
Parish; Precincts 43, 44, and 45 of St. Mary Parish; and Precincts 1, 2, 5, 7, 8, 10, 11,
27, 28, 33, 37, 64, 67, and 76 of Terrebonne Parish.
(52) District 52 is composed of Precincts 12, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 35, 38, 39,
41, 42, 43, 45, 48, 51, 68, 69, 81, 83, 84, 85, 87, 90, 94, and 95 of Terrebonne Parish.
Page 7 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1034 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 698
(53) District 53 is composed of Precincts 19, 20, 23, 25, 29, 31, 34, 49, 52,
53, 55, 56, 57, 59, 60, 62, 63, 71, 72, 73, 88, 100, and 110 of Terrebonne Parish.
(54) District 54 is composed of Precincts 1-GI of Jefferson Parish and
Precincts 3-2, 3-3, 3-7, 4-1, 4-2, 4-3, 4-4, 4-5, 4-6, 7-3, 8-1, 9-1, 9-2, 10-1, 10-2,
10-3, 10-4, 10-6, 10-8, 10-9, 10-10, 10-11, 10-12, 10-13, 10-14, 10-15, 10-16, 11-1,
and 11-2 of Lafourche Parish.
(55) District 55 is composed of Precincts 1-3, 1-5, 2-1, 2-1A, 2-2, 2-3, 2-5,
2-6, 2-7, 2-8, 2-9, 2-10, 2-11, 2-12, 2-13, 2-14, 2-15, 2-16, 3-1, 3-4, 3-5, 3-6, 5-1,
5-1A, 5-2, 5-3, 6-1, 6-2, 6-3, 6-4, 6-5, 7-1, 7-2, 7-4, and 11-4 of Lafourche Parish.
(56) District 56 is composed of Precincts 1-4, 1-6, 2-1, 2-3, 2-4, 2-5, 2-6,
3-1, 3-2, 3-3, 4-2, 4-3, 4-4, 4-5, 5-1, 5-3, 5-4, 5-5, 6-1, 6-2, 6-3, 6-4, 6-6, 7-1, 7-2,
7-3, and 7-5 of St. Charles Parish.
(57) District 57 is composed of Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 1-5, 4-1, and 7-4 of
St. Charles Parish and Precincts 1-2, 1-4, 1-5, 1-6, 1-7, 2-4, 3-2, 3-4, 3-7, 4-1, 4-2,
4-3, 4-4, 4-5, 5-1, 5-2, 5-3, 5-4, 5-5, 6-1, 6-2, 6-3, 6-4, 6-5, 7-1, 7-2, 7-3, and 7-4 of
St. John the Baptist Parish.
(58) District 58 is composed of Precincts 39, 40, 44, and 50 of Ascension
Parish; Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 2-1, 4-1, 5-1, 5-2, 5-3, 5-5, 6-1, 6-2, 6-3, and 7-1 of
Assumption Parish; St. James Parish; and Precincts 1-1, 1-3, 2-1, 2-2, 2-3, 2-5, 3-1,
and 3-3 of St. John the Baptist Parish.
(59) District 59 is composed of Precincts 1, 2, 7, 8, 9, 11, 16, 17, 19, 20, 61,
62, 63, 64, 71, 72, 77, and 78 of Ascension Parish.
(60) District 60 is composed of Precincts 6, 28, 30, 31, 32, 36, 37, 38, 42, 45,
47, 48, 51, 52, 53, 54, 55, 57, and 66 of Ascension Parish and Precincts 1, 3, 6, 7, 9,
10, 10B, 11, 12, 13, 14, 14A, 15, 15A, 16, 17, 18, and 19 of Iberville Parish.
(61) District 61 is composed of Precincts 1-8, 1-10, 1-14, 1-15, 1-26, 1-27,
1-28, 1-29, 1-32, 1-36, 1-37, 1-38, 1-39, 1-40, 1-41, 1-42, 1-44, 1-48, 1-59, 1-61,
1-63, 1-64, 1-65, and 1-69 of East Baton Rouge Parish.
Page 8 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1034 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 698
(62) District 62 is composed of Precincts 2-6, 2-7, 2-8, 2-33, and 3-6 of East
Baton Rouge Parish; East Feliciana Parish; and West Feliciana Parish.
(63) District 63 is composed of Precincts 1-101, 2-2, 2-3, 2-4, 2-9, 2-13,
2-14, 2-15, 2-17, 2-18, 2-19, 2-20, 2-21, 2-24, 2-25, 2-26, 2-28, 2-29, 2-31, 2-34,
2-35, 2-36, 2-38, 3-1, and 3-37 of East Baton Rouge Parish.
(64) District 64 is composed of Precincts 1B, 2, 2A, 4, 4A, 4B, 5B, 7A, 25,
26, 26A, 26B, 26C, 27, 35, 35A, 36, 39, 39A, 39B, 40, 40A, and 41 of Livingston
Parish.
(65) District 65 is composed of Precincts 1-11, 1-77, 1-84, 1-91, 2-10, 2-11,
2-12, 2-16, 2-22, 2-23, 2-27, 2-30, 3-2, 3-9, 3-14, 3-25, 3-26, 3-30, 3-46, 3-58, and
3-61 of East Baton Rouge Parish.
(66) District 66 is composed of Precincts 3-4, 3-18, 3-19, 3-22, 3-33, 3-34,
3-39, 3-40, 3-45, 3-47, 3-48, 3-49, 3-56, 3-62, 3-63, 3-64, 3-66, 3-67, 3-68, 3-70,
3-75, and 3-76 of East Baton Rouge Parish.
(67) District 67 is composed of Precincts 1-1, 1-3, 1-4, 1-5, 1-6, 1-7, 1-13,
1-16, 1-18, 1-19, 1-21, 1-22, 1-23, 1-45, 1-46, 1-51, 1-67, 1-102, 3-20, 3-44, 3-50,
3-57, and 3-69 of East Baton Rouge Parish.
(68) District 68 is composed of Precincts 1-2, 1-24, 1-25, 1-30, 1-31, 1-33,
1-34, 1-35, 1-49, 1-50, 1-57, 1-58, 1-62, 1-66, 1-73, 1-74, 1-79, 1-104, 1-105, 3-51,
3-52, and 3-55 of East Baton Rouge Parish.
(69) District 69 is composed of Precincts 1-54, 1-70, 1-82, 1-89, 1-93, 1-97,
1-98, 1-103, 2-1, 3-8, 3-10, 3-12, 3-21, 3-28, 3-32, 3-42, 3-54, 3-59, and 3-72 of East
Baton Rouge Parish.
(70) District 70 is composed of Precincts 1-12, 1-43, 1-47, 1-56, 1-75, 1-76,
1-80, 1-106, 1-107, 3-5, 3-13, 3-17, 3-23, 3-29, 3-31, 3-35, 3-36, 3-60, 3-65, and
3-74 of East Baton Rouge Parish.
(71) District 71 is composed of Precincts 1-99, 3-3, 3-7, 3-11, 3-15, 3-16,
3-38, 3-41, 3-43, 3-53, 3-71, and 3-73 of East Baton Rouge Parish and Precincts 23,
23A, 23B, 23C, 24, 24B, 24C, 24D, and 28 of Livingston Parish.
Page 9 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1034 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 698
(72) District 72 is composed of St. Helena Parish and Precincts 2, 6, 11, 15,
17, 28, 40A, 41, 42, 43, 45B, 46, 101, 107, 109, 111A, 115B, 119, 123, and 129A of
Tangipahoa Parish.
(73) District 73 is composed of Precincts 45A, 70, 70A, 71, 72, 72A, 73, 74,
124, 125, 133, 133A, 137, 137A, 137B, 137C, 137D, 139, 145, 149, 149A, and 151
of Tangipahoa Parish.
(74) District 74 is composed of Precincts 201, 202, 203, 204, 205, 206, 207,
302, 303, 304, 305, 308, 501, 502, 503, 504, 505, 602, 603, 604, 606, 609, A01, A02,
A02A, A03, A04, C09, F01, and P01 of St. Tammany Parish.
(75) District 75 is composed of Washington Parish.
(76) District 76 is composed of Precincts 801, 804, 805, 806, 807, 808, 809,
810, 811, 812, 813, 814, 816, 817, 818, 908, 909, 909A, 918, 922, S10, S11, S16,
S17, S21, S23, and S24 of St. Tammany Parish.
(77) District 77 is composed of Precincts 101, 104, 105, 106, 106A, 107,
108, 110, 111, 112, 113, 114, 115, 116, 118, 301, 310, 314, C01, C02, C03, C04,
C06, C07, C08, and C11 of St. Tammany Parish.
(78) District 78 is composed of Precincts 9, 11, 21, 22, 51, 52, 53, 54, 56, 57,
58, 59, 61, 62, 117, 118, 119, 120, 121, 122, 123, 124, 1-H, 2-H, 3-H, 4-H, 6-H, 7-H,
8-H, and 9-H of Jefferson Parish.
(79) District 79 is composed of Precincts 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17,
1-K, 2-K, 3-K, 4-K, 5-K, 6-KA, 6-KB, 7-KA, 7-KB, 8-K, 9-K, 10-K, 12-K, 34-K,
and 35-K of Jefferson Parish.
(80) District 80 is composed of Precincts 18, 19, 20, 23, 24, 29, 31, 32, 33,
35, 36, 37, 40, 70, 71, 73, 74, 75, 76, 77, 78, 79, 81, 82, 83, 84, 85, 86, and 87 of
Jefferson Parish.
(81) District 81 is composed of Precincts 14, 15, 22, 27 and 69 of Ascension
Parish and Precincts 7, 7B, 7C, 7D, 11, 12, 13A, 13B, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 18A, 19,
19A, 20, 21, 21A, 21B, 22, 30, 31, 32, 33, 34, 38, and 43 of Livingston Parish.
Page 10 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1034 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 698
(82) District 82 is composed of Precincts 38, 43, 60, 63, 64, 65, 66, 68, 69,
72, 80, 88, 89, 90, 91, 92, 93, 94, 95, 96, 97, 98, 99, 100, 101, 102, 103, 105, 106,
125A, 125B, 126, 127, 128, 129, 130, 131, 132, 133, 134, 136, and 138 of Jefferson
Parish.
(83) District 83 is composed of Precincts 150A, 150B, 151, 152, 153, 154,
155, 156, 157A, 170, 179B, 180, 187, 188, 191, 200, 201, 1-W, 3-W, 4-W, 5-W,
6-W, and 7-W of Jefferson Parish.
(84) District 84 is composed of Precincts 174, 175, 176, 177, 178, 182, 183,
184, 185A, 185B, 189, 190, 192, 193A, 193B, 194A, 194B, 198, 199, 202, 203, 204,
246, 247, 248, and 1-L of Jefferson Parish.
(85) District 85 is composed of Precincts 225, 226, 227, 228, 229, 230, 231,
232A, 234, 235, 1-G, 2-G, 3-G, 4-G, 5-G, 6-G, 7-G, 8-G, 9-G, 10-G, 11-G, 12-G,
and 13-G of Jefferson Parish.
(86) District 86 is composed of Precincts 16, 44, 47, 49, 102, 104, 106,
106A, 108, 110, 112, 114, 116, 118, 118A, 120, 120A, 120B, 122A, 122B, 122C,
141, 141A, 143, 143A, and 147 of Tangipahoa Parish.
(87) District 87 is composed of Precincts 171, 172, 173, 179A, 181, 195,
196, 197A, 197B, 205, 210, 211, 212, 213A, 213B, 213C, 214A, 214B, 215, 216A,
and 217 of Jefferson Parish.
(88) District 88 is composed of Precincts 3, 4, 5, 10, 12, 13, 18, 21, 23, 24,
25, 26, 33, 34, 35, 41, 43, 58, 65, 68, 73, and 76 of Ascension Parish.
(89) District 89 is composed of Precincts 102, 103, 306, 401, 402, 403, 404,
405, 407, 410, 413, 414, 415, 416, 417, 418, 419, 421, 426, 427, 429, M01, M02,
M04, M06, M07, M08, M11, M12, and MD1 of St. Tammany Parish.
(90) District 90 is composed of Precincts 802, 802A, 803, 815, 815A, 902,
903, 903A, 904, 906, 907, 910, 911, 914, 916, 921, S01, S02, S03, S04, S05, S06,
S07, S08, S09, S13, S15, S18, S19, and S22 of St. Tammany Parish.
(91) District 91 is composed of Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 2-6, 10-3, 10-6, 10-7,
10-8, 10-9, 10-11, 10-12, 10-13, 10-14, 11-2, 11-3, 11-4, 11-5, 11-8, 11-9, 11-10,
Page 11 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1034 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 698
11-11, 11-12, 11-13, 11-14, 11-17, 12-1, 12-2, 12-3, 12-4, 12-5, 12-6, 12-7, 12-9,
12-10, 12-11, 12-12, 12-13, 12-14, 12-16, 12-17, 12-19, 14-20, 14-21, 14-23,
14-24A, 14-25, and 14-26 of Orleans Parish.
(92) District 92 is composed of Precincts 7, 8, 10, 55, 104, 108, 115, 116,
11-K, 13-KA, 13-KB, 14-K, 15-K, 16-K, 17-K, 19-K, 20-K, 21-K, 22-K, 23-K,
24-K, 25-K, 26-K, 27-K, 28-K, 29-K, 30-K, 31-K and 33-K, of Jefferson Parish.
(93) District 93 is composed of Precincts 1-5, 1-6, 2-1, 2-2, 2-4, 3-1, 4-2,
5-1, 5-2, 5-3, 5-5, 5-7, 6-1, 6-2, 6-4, 6-6, 7-2, 7-4, 7-5, 7-6, 7-7, 7-8, 7-9A, 7-10,
7-11, 7-13, 7-14, 7-20, 8-4, 8-6, 8-7, 8-8, 8-9, 8-12, 9-10, 9-17, 9-19, 9-21, 9-23,
9-25, and 9-26 of Orleans Parish.
(94) District 94 is composed of Precincts 25, 26, 27, 28, 30, 34, 39, 41, 42,
44, 45, and 46 of Jefferson Parish and Precincts 4-9, 4-11, 4-14, 4-15, 4-17, 4-17A,
4-18, 4-20, 4-21, 4-22, 4-23, 5-16, 5-17, 5-18, 7-41, 7-42, 17-17, 17-18, 17-18A,
17-19, and 17-20 of Orleans Parish.
(95) District 95 is composed of Precincts 1, 1A, 1C, 1D, 3, 3A, 3B, 5, 5A,
5D, 6, 6A, 6B, 8A, 8B, 9, 10, 11A, 29, and 36A of Livingston Parish and Precincts
33, 117, 121, 121A, and 127 of Tangipahoa Parish.
(96) District 96 is composed of Precincts 1-1, 1-7, 1-8, 2-1, 4-1, 4-2, 4-3,
5-3, 6-1, 6-4, 9-1, 9-2, 10-1, 10-2, 11-1, 11-4, 11-6, 12-1, 12-2, and 12-3 of Iberia
Parish; Precincts 9 (Part) Tract 020401 - Blocks 1003, 1004, 1005, 4000, 4001, 4002,
4003, and 5004; Tract 020602 - Blocks 5002, 5004, 5011; 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, and 15
of St. Martin Parish; and Precincts 1, 2, 3, 5, 7, 8, 9, 11, 12, 13, 15, 16, and 18 of St.
Mary Parish.
(97) District 97 is composed of Precincts 7-17, 7-18, 7-19, 7-23, 7-24, 7-25,
7-25A, 7-26, 7-27, 7-28, 7-28A, 7-29, 7-30, 7-32, 7-33, 7-35, 7-37, 7-37A, 7-40,
8-13, 8-14, 8-15, 8-19, 8-20, 8-21, 8-22, 8-23, 8-24, 8-25, 8-26, 8-27, 8-28, 8-30,
9-29, 9-30, 9-30A, 9-31, 9-31A, 9-31B, 9-31D, and 9-33 of Orleans Parish.
(98) District 98 is composed of Precincts 13-1, 13-2, 13-3, 13-4, 13-5, 13-6,
13-7, 13-8, 13-9, 13-10, 13-11, 13-12, 13-13, 13-14, 13-15, 13-16, 14-1, 14-2, 14-3,
Page 12 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1034 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 698
14-4, 14-5, 14-6, 14-7, 14-8, 14-9, 14-10, 14-11, 14-12, 14-13A, 14-14, 14-15,
14-16, 14-17, 14-18A, 14-19, 16-1, 16-1A, 16-2, 16-3, 16-4, 16-5, 16-6, 16-7, 17-1,
17-2, 17-3, 17-4, 17-5, 17-6, and 17-7 of Orleans Parish.
(99) District 99 is composed of Precincts 7-1, 8-1, 8-2, 9-1, 9-3, 9-4, 9-5,
9-6, 9-7, 9-8, 9-9, 9-11, 9-12, 9-13, 9-14, 9-15, 9-16, 9-28, 9-28C, 9-32, 9-34A, 9-35,
9-35A, 9-36, 9-36B, 9-37, 9-38, 9-38A, 9-42, 9-42C, 9-43A, 9-43B, 9-43C, 9-43E,
9-43F, 9-43H, 9-43I, 9-43M, and 9-43N of Orleans Parish.
(100) District 100 is composed of Precincts 9-39, 9-39B, 9-40, 9-40A,
9-40C, 9-41, 9-41A, 9-41B, 9-41C, 9-41D, 9-43G, 9-43J, 9-43K, 9-43L, 9-44,
9-44A, 9-44B, 9-44D, 9-44E, 9-44F, 9-44G, 9-44I, 9-44J, 9-44L, 9-44M, 9-44N,
9-44O, 9-44P, 9-44Q, 9-45, and 9-45A of Orleans Parish.
(101) District 101 is composed of Precincts 1-9, 1-20, 1-52, 1-53, 1-55, 1-60,
1-71, 1-72, 1-78, 1-81, 1-83, 1-87, 1-88, 1-90, 1-96, 3-24, and 3-27 of East Baton
Rouge Parish.
(102) District 102 is composed of Precincts 15-1, 15-2, 15-3, 15-5, 15-6,
15-8, 15-9, 15-10, 15-11, 15-12, 15-12A, 15-13, 15-13A, 15-13B, 15-14, 15-14A,
15-14B, 15-14C, 15-14D, 15-14E, 15-14F, 15-14G, 15-15, 15-15A, 15-15B, 15-16,
15-17, 15-17A, 15-17B, 15-18, 15-18A, 15-18B, 15-18C, 15-18F, 15-19, 15-19A,
15-19B, and 15-19C of Orleans Parish.
(103) District 103 is composed of St. Bernard Parish.
(104) District 104 is composed of Precincts 307, 309, 312, 312A, 313, 406,
408, 409, 411, 412, 420, 422, 430, 605, 701, 702, 703, 704, 705, 706, 901, 905, 913,
915, 917, M09, M09A, and M10 of St. Tammany Parish.
(105) District 105 is composed of Precincts 216B, 232B, 236, 237, 238A,
and 238B of Jefferson Parish; Precincts 15-18D and 15-18E of Orleans Parish; and
Plaquemines Parish.
Section 2. R.S. 24:35.3 is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Section 3.(A) The precincts referenced in this Act are those contained in the file
named "2026 Precinct Shapefiles (01-27-2026)" available on the website of the Legislature
Page 13 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1034 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 698
of Louisiana on the effective date of this Section. The 2026 Precinct Shapefiles are based
upon those Voting Districts (VTDs) contained in the 2020 Census Redistricting TIGER/Line
Shapefiles for the State of Louisiana as those files have been modified and validated through
the data verification program of the Louisiana House of Representatives and the Louisiana
Senate to represent precinct changes submitted through January 27, 2026, to the Legislature
of Louisiana by parish governing authorities pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 18:532 and
532.1.
(B) When a precinct referenced in this Act has been subdivided by action of the
parish governing authority on a nongeographic basis or subdivided by action of the parish
governing authority on a geographic basis in accordance with the provisions of R.S.
18:532.1, the enumeration in this Act of the general precinct designation shall include all
nongeographic and all geographic subdivisions thereof, however such subdivisions may be
designated.
(C) The territorial limits of the districts as provided in this Act shall continue in
effect until changed by law regardless of any subsequent change made to the precincts by
the parish governing authority.
Section 4. The provisions of this Act shall not reduce the term of office of any
person holding any position or office on the effective date of this Section for which the
appointment or election is based upon a House of Representatives district as composed
pursuant to R.S. 24:35.3. Any position or office that is filled by appointment or election
based upon a House of Representatives district and that is to be filled after January 10, 2028,
shall be appointed or elected based upon the district as it is described in Section 1 of this
Act.
Section 5.(A) Solely for the purposes of qualifying for election and the conduct of
the election of representatives to the Louisiana House of Representatives at the regularly
scheduled election for members of the Louisiana House of Representatives in 2027, the
provisions of Section 1 of this Act shall become effective upon signature of this Act by the
governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become
law without signature by the governor, as provided in Article III, Section 18 of the
Page 14 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1034 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 698
Constitution of Louisiana. If this Act is vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved
by the legislature, the provisions of Section 1 of this Act shall become effective on the day
following such approval for the purposes established in this Subsection.
(B) For subsequent elections of representatives to the Louisiana House of
Representative and for all other purposes, the provisions of Section 1 of this Act shall
become effective at 10:00 a.m. on January 10, 2028.
(C) The provisions of Section 2 of this Act shall become effective at 10:00 a.m. on
January 10, 2028.
(D) The provisions of this Section and Sections 3 and 4 of this Act shall become
effective upon signature of this Act by the governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon
expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature by the governor, as provided
in Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If this Act is vetoed by the
governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, the provisions of this Section and
Sections 3 and 4 of this Act shall become effective on the day following such approval.